Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0119.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1170c. By not later than the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall ensure that the model core academic curriculum content standards for biology and the subject area content expectations and guidelines for biology under section 1278b provide for an overview of human biology related to pregnancy, including at least all of the following: (a) An overview of human development inside the uterus. (b) A presentation of a high-definition ultrasound video, not less than 3 minutes in duration, showing the development of the brain, heart, and other vital organs in early fetal development. (c) A presentation of a high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation showing every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development for every significant marker of pregnancy until birth.